North Carolina statutes. Chapter 115D. Community Colleges.
Article 7. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 115D-77.
Nondiscrimination policy.

It is the policy of the State Board of Community Colleges and of local boards of trustees of the State of North Carolina not to discriminate among students on the basis of race, gender, national origin, religion, age, or disability.

The State Board and each board of trustees shall give equal opportunity for employment and compensation of personnel at community colleges, without regard to race, religion, color, creed, national origin, sex, age, or disability, except where specific age, sex or physical or mental requirements constitute bona fide occupational qualifications.

History.

1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1991, c. 84, s. 4; 1999-84, s. 6.

§ 115D-78.
Access to information and public records; small business counseling information.

In accordance with Chapter 132 of the General Statutes, all rules, regulations and public records of the State Board of Community Colleges, the Community Colleges System Office, and local boards of trustees shall be available for examination and reproduction on payment of fees by any person.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, documents submitted to the North Carolina Community College System’s Small Business Center Network by an individual seeking business counseling or technical assistance and documents created by the Network to provide the individual with counseling and technical assistance are not public records as defined by

G.S. 132-1

.

History.

1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1999-84, s. 16; 2011-297, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-297, s. 1, effective June 24, 2011, added “small business counselling information” in the section catchline; added the subsection (a) designation; and added subsection (b).

§ 115D-79.
Open meetings.

All official meetings of the State Board of Community Colleges and of local boards of trustees shall be open to the public in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 143-318.1 through 143-318.7.

History.

1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1.

§ 115D-80.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 8.18(b1), as amended by Session Laws 2011-391, s. 19, effective July 1, 2011.

History.

1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 17; repealed by 2011-145, s. 8.18(b1), effective June 15, 2011; 2011-391, s. 19.

§ 115D-81.
Saving clauses.

Continuation of Existing Law. — The provisions of this Chapter, insofar as they are the same as those of existing laws, are intended as a continuation of such laws and not as new enactments. The repeal by the act enacting this Chapter of any statute or part thereof shall not revive any statute or part thereof previously repealed or suspended. The provisions of this section shall not affect title to, or ownership of, any real or personal property vested before April 26, 1979. This Chapter shall not in any way affect or repeal any local acts in conflict with the terms of this Chapter.

Existing Rights and Liabilities. — The provisions of this Chapter shall not affect any act done, liability incurred or right accrued or vested, or affect any suit or prosecution pending or to be instituted to enforce any right or penalty or punish any offense under the authority of statutes repealed by the act enacting this Chapter.

History.

1979, c. 462, s. 2.

§§ 115D-82 through 115D-86.

Reserved for future codification purposes.